District of Columbia statutes.
3-1519

Repealed

Use of title or designation — Injunction against unlawful acts.

Repealed.

Mar. 16, 1978, D.C. Law 2-59, § 20, 24 DCR 5975
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1234, 46 DCR 3142
1981 Ed., § 2-119.
1973 Ed., § 2-959.
Revision of chapter: See note to § 3-1501.